Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.30, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Use of proceeds. (a) Counties and Tribal governments that receive a distribution under this section must use the proceeds to fund new or existing family homeless prevention and assistance projects or programs. These projects or programs may be administered by a county, a group of contiguous counties jointly acting together, a city, a group of contiguous cities jointly acting together, a Tribal government, a group of Tribal governments, or a community-based nonprofit organization. Each project or program must include plans for: (1) targeting families with children who are eligible for a prekindergarten through grade 12 academic program and are: (i) living in overcrowded conditions in their current housing; (ii) paying more than 50 percent of their income for rent; or (iii) lacking a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence; (2) targeting unaccompanied youth in need of an alternative residential setting; (3) connecting families with the social services necessary to maintain the families' stability in their homes, including but not limited to housing navigation, legal representation, and family outreach; and (4) one or more of the following: (i) providing rental assistance for a specified period of time which may exceed 24 months; or (ii) providing support and case management services to improve housing stability, including but not limited to housing navigation and family outreach. (b) Counties new text begin and Tribal governments new text end may choose not to spend all or a portion of the distribution under this section. Any unspent deleted text begin fundsdeleted text end new text begin moneynew text end must be returned to the commissioner of revenue by December 31 of the year following the year that the aid was received. Any deleted text begin fundsdeleted text end new text begin moneynew text end returned to the commissioner under this paragraph must be added to the overall distribution of aids certified under this section in the following year. deleted text begin Any unspent funds returned to the commissioner after the expiration under subdivision 8 are canceled to the general fund.deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with aids payable in 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.30, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Appropriation. (a) $17,600,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to counties required under this section.new text begin Unspent money returned to the commissioner of revenue by counties pursuant to subdivision 4, paragraph (b), are appropriated to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to counties required under this section.new text end (b) $2,400,000 is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to Tribal governments required under this section.new text begin Unspent money returned to the commissioner of revenue by Tribal governments pursuant to subdivision 4, paragraph (b), are appropriated to the commissioner of revenue to make payments to Tribal governments required under this section.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with aids payable in 2027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.30, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Report. (a) No later than January 15, 2025, the commissioner of revenue must produce a report on projects and programs funded by counties and Tribal governments under this section. The report must include a list of the projects and programs, the number of people served by each, and an assessment of how each project and program impacts people who are currently experiencing homelessness or who are at risk of experiencing homelessness, as reported by the counties and Tribal governments to the commissioner by deleted text begin Decemberdeleted text end new text begin Januarynew text end 31 each year on a form prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner must provide a copy of the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over property taxes and services for persons experiencing homelessness. (b) The report in paragraph (a) must be updated every two years new text begin and produced by March 15 of each year the report is due, new text end and the commissioner of revenue must provide copies of the updated reports to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over property taxes and services for persons experiencing homelessness by deleted text begin Januarydeleted text end new text begin Marchnew text end 15 of the year the report is due. deleted text begin Report requirements under this subdivision expire following the report which includes the final distribution preceding the expiration in subdivision 8.deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with aids payable in 2027. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.30, subdivision 8, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-07749 477A.30 LOCAL HOMELESS PREVENTION AID. Subd. 8. Expiration. Distributions under this section expire after aids payable in 2028 have been distributed.